Hawaii statutes.
[§663-9] Liability of animal owners.
(a) The owner or harborer of an animal, if the animal proximately causes
either personal or property damage to any person, shall be liable in damages to
the person injured regardless of the animal owner's or harborer's lack of
scienter of the vicious or dangerous propensities of the animal.

(b) The owner or harborer of an animal which
is known by its species or nature to be dangerous, wild, or vicious, if the
animal proximately causes either personal or property damage to any person,
shall be absolutely liable for such damage. [L 1980, c 218, §2]

Cross References

Actions for removal or destruction of dogs biting humans, see
§142-75.

Equine activities, see chapter 663B.

Liability of dog owner, see §142-74.

Case Notes

Subsection (b) does not impose strict liability on dog
owners. 6 H. App. 485, 727 P.2d 1131 (1986).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next